Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.065

Judges—Grant, Ferry, Okanogan, Mason, Thurston, Pacific, Wahkiakum, Pend Oreille, Stevens, San Juan, and Island counties.

There shall be in the county of Grant, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Okanogan, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Mason, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Thurston, nine judges of the superior court; in the counties of Pacific and Wahkiakum jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the counties of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens jointly, three judges of the superior court; in the county of San Juan, one judge of the superior court; and in the county of Island, two judges of the superior court.

[ 2021 c 63 s 1; 2020 c 53 s 3; 2014 c 169 s 1; 2007 c 95 s 1; 1999 c 245 s 1; 1996 c 208 s 5; 1992 c 189 s 5; 1990 c 186 s 2; 1986 c 76 s 1; 1981 c 65 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 202 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 311 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 27 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 83 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 213 s 3; 1955 c 159 s 1; 1951 c 125 s 7. Prior: 1927 c 135 s 1, part; 1917 c 97 ss 4, 5, part; 1913 c 17 s 1; 1911 c 131 s 2; 1907 c 79 s 1, part; 1907 c 178 s 1, part; 1903 c 50 s 1, part; 1895 c 89 s 1, part; 1891 c 68 ss 1, 3, part; 1890 p 341 s 1, part; RRS s 11045-1, part.]

NOTES:

Additional judicial position in Thurston county subject to approval and agreement—2021 c 63 s 1: "(1) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective only if Thurston county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law and the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial position created by section 1 of this act is effective November 1, 2021." [ 2021 c 63 s 2.]

Additional judicial position subject to approval and agreement—2020 c 53 s 3: "(1) The additional judicial position created by section 3, chapter 53, Laws of 2020 is effective only if Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties, jointly through their duly constituted legislative authorities, document their approval of the additional position and their agreement that they will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law and the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial position created by section 3, chapter 53, Laws of 2020 is effective no later than July 1, 2020. An earlier starting date for the position may be established by joint action of the duly constituted legislative authorities of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties, upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the executive authorities of each of Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Stevens counties, if any." [ 2020 c 53 s 4.]

Additional judicial position subject to approval and agreement—2014 c 169: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Mason county becomes effective only if the county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute." [ 2014 c 169 s 2.]

Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—2007 c 95: "The two judicial positions serving San Juan and Island counties jointly are allocated to Island county effective the date upon which the judge for San Juan county superior court assumes office. The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act is allocated to San Juan county and becomes effective only if:

(1) San Juan county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law or the state Constitution; and

(2) Island county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the two judicial positions currently serving San Juan and Island counties jointly as provided by state law or the state Constitution." [ 2007 c 95 s 2.]

Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1999 c 245: "(1) The additional judicial position for Grant county created by section 1 of this act is effective only if Grant county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by state law or the state Constitution.

(2) The additional judicial position for Okanogan county created by section 1 of this act is effective only if Okanogan county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the existing and additional judicial positions as provided by state law or the state Constitution." [ 1999 c 245 s 2.]

Additional judicial positions in Thurston county subject to approval and agreement—1996 c 208: "The additional judicial positions created by section 5 of this act are effective only if Thurston county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial positions as provided by state law or the state Constitution." [ 1996 c 208 s 6.]

Effective dates of additional judicial positions in Thurston county—1996 c 208: "One judicial position created by section 5 of this act shall be effective July 1, 1996; the second position shall be effective July 1, 2000." [ 1996 c 208 s 7.]

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1992 c 189: See notes following RCW 2.08.061.

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in Kitsap and Thurston counties subject to approval and agreement—1990 c 186:See note following RCW 2.08.062.

Effective date—Appointment of additional judicial position—1986 c 76: "(1) Pursuant to RCW 2.08.069, the governor shall appoint a person to fill the judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Mason county. The five judges of the superior court serving in the Thurston/Mason judicial district on January 1, 1987, shall be assigned to the new Thurston county judicial district.

(2) This act shall take effect January 1, 1987. The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Mason county shall be effective only if, before January 1, 1987, Thurston and Mason counties, through their duly constituted legislative authorities, document their approval of the additional position and their agreement that they will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses resulting from section 1 of this act." [ 1986 c 76 s 2.]

Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement: See note following RCW 2.08.064.

Adjustment in judicial services provided for Douglas, Grant, and Chelan counties: "The superior court judge serving in position two, as designated by the county auditors of Grant and Douglas counties for the 1976 general election, in the counties of Grant and Douglas prior to the effective date of this 1979 act, shall thereafter serve jointly in the counties of Douglas and Chelan, along with the judge previously serving only in Chelan county. The additional superior court judge position created by this 1979 act shall be for Grant county alone, which shall retain the judge in position one previously serving jointly in the counties of Grant and Douglas." [ 1979 ex.s. c 202 s 5.]

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 311: See note following RCW 2.08.061.